Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2903
Mutual insurance association; coverages; supplement professional liability insurance.

Any association authorized by section 44-2901 or 44-2902 shall be authorized to insure members against other liability for injury to persons or property caused by agents or employees of the member or by property used in or activities arising from the operations or business of the member or the professional services of member physicians or their agents or employees. Such coverage against other liability may be provided to members only to supplement professional liability insurance from the association.

Laws 1976, LB 809, § 3.